src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
!! Noun inflection for Võro
!! ------------------------
LEXICON N_ !!= * @CODE@ Lacks specific continuation lexicon
+N+WORK: #;

LEXICON N_1HANSʼA !!= @CODE@ 1 hansʼa:hansʼa
        N_1HANSʼA-SG ;
        N_1HANSʼA-PL ;

LEXICON N_1HANSʼA-SG
+N:     NMN_1HANSʼA-SG ;
LEXICON N_1HANSʼA-PL
+N:     NMN_1HANSʼA-PL ;

LEXICON N_1VIU !!= @CODE@ 1 viu:viu
	N_1VIU-SG ;
	N_1VIU-PL ;

LEXICON N_1VIU-SG
+N:	NMN_1VIU-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1VIU-PL
+N:	NMN_1VIU-PL ; 


LEXICON N_1HERRÄ !!= @CODE@ 1 herrä:herrä
	N_1HERRÄ-SG ;
	N_1HERRÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_1HERRÄ-SG
+N:	NMN_1HERRÄ-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1HERRÄ-PL
+N:	NMN_1HERRÄ-PL ; 

LEXICON N_1PREI !!= @CODE@ 1 prei:prei
	N_1PREI-SG ;
	N_1PREI-PL ;

LEXICON N_1PREI-SG
+N:	NMN_1PREI-SG ; 
LEXICON N_1PREI-PL
+N:	NMN_1PREI-PL ; 

LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI
!! * Yaml: __suhvli__
   N_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
   N_2ARTIKLI-PL ;

LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI-SG
+N:	NMN_2ARTIKLI-SG ;
LEXICON N_2ARTIKLI-PL
+N:	NMN_2ARTIKLI-PL ;


LEXICON N_2KERGE
!! * Yaml: __kerge__
   N_2KERGE-SG ;
   N_2KERGE-PL ;

LEXICON N_2KERGE-SG
+N:	NMN_2KERGE-SG ;
LEXICON N_2KERGE-PL
+N:	NMN_2KERGE-PL ;


LEXICON N_3PERÄDÜ !!= @CODE@ perädü:perädü
!! * Yaml: __peraedue__
   N_3PERÄDÜ-SG ;
   N_3PERÄDÜ-PL ;

LEXICON N_3PERÄDÜ-SG
+N:     NMN_3PERÄDÜ-SG ;
LEXICON N_3PERÄDÜ-PL
+N:     NMN_3PERÄDÜ-PL ;

LEXICON N_3ALADU !!= @CODE@ aladu:aladu
!! * Yaml: __peraedue__
   N_3ALADU-SG ;
   N_3ALADU-PL ;

LEXICON N_3ALADU-SG
+N:     NMN_3ALADU-SG ;
LEXICON N_3ALADU-PL
+N:     NMN_3ALADU-PL ;


LEXICON N_4TERVÜS
!! * Yaml: __tervues__
   N_4TERVÜS-SG ;
   N_4TERVÜS-PL ;
LEXICON N_4TERVÜS-SG
+N:     NMN_4TERVÜS-SG ;
LEXICON N_4TERVÜS-PL
+N:     NMN_4TERVÜS-PL ;

LEXICON N_4AINUS
!! * Yaml: __A-ainus__
   N_4AINUS-SG ;
   N_4AINUS-PL ;
LEXICON N_4AINUS-SG
+N:     NMN_4AINUS-SG ;
LEXICON N_4AINUS-PL
+N:     NMN_4AINUS-PL ;


LEXICON N_5OPPAJA
!! * Yaml: __N-oppaja5__
   N_5OPPAJA-SG ;
   N_5OPPAJA-PL ;

LEXICON N_5OPPAJA-SG
+N:	NMN_5OPPAJA-SG ;
LEXICON N_5OPPAJA-PL
+N:	NMN_5OPPAJA-PL ;

LEXICON N_5MÄNGJÄ
!! * Yaml: __N-mängjä5__
   N_5MÄNGJÄ-SG ;
   N_5MÄNGJÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_5MÄNGJÄ-SG
+N:	NMN_5MÄNGJÄ-SG ;
LEXICON N_5MÄNGJÄ-PL
+N:	NMN_5MÄNGJÄ-PL ;

LEXICON N_6MAKÕ
 N_6MAKÕ-SG ;
 N_6MAKÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_6MAKÕ-SG
+N: NMN_6MAKÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_6MAKÕ-PL
+N: NMN_6MAKÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_7FÜÜSIGA
!! * Yaml: __fueuesiga__
   N_7FÜÜSIGA-SG ;
   N_7FÜÜSIGA-PL ;

LEXICON N_7FÜÜSIGA-SG
+N:     NMN_7FÜÜSIGA-SG ;
LEXICON N_7FÜÜSIGA-PL
+N:     NMN_7FÜÜSIGA-PL ;

LEXICON N_8KASK
 N_8KASK-SG ;
 N_8KASK-PL ;
LEXICON N_8KASK-SG
+N: NMN_8KASK-SG ;
LEXICON N_8KASK-PL
+N: NMN_8KASK-PL ;

LEXICON N_8SADANG
 N_8SADANG-SG ;
 N_8SADANG-PL ;
LEXICON N_8SADANG-SG
+N: NMN_8SADANG-SG ;
LEXICON N_8SADANG-PL
+N: NMN_8SADANG-PL ;

LEXICON N_8DOLLARʼ
 N_8DOLLARʼ-SG ;
 N_8DOLLARʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_8DOLLARʼ-SG
+N: NMN_8DOLLARʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_8DOLLARʼ-PL
+N: NMN_8DOLLARʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_8EEDERʼ
 N_8EEDERʼ-SG ;
 N_8EEDERʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_8EEDERʼ-SG
+N: NMN_8EEDERʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_8EEDERʼ-PL
+N: NMN_8EEDERʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_8HÄIELM
 N_8HÄIELM-SG ;
 N_8HÄIELM-PL ;
LEXICON N_8HÄIELM-SG
+N: NMN_8HÄIELM-SG ;
LEXICON N_8HÄIELM-PL
+N: NMN_8HÄIELM-PL ;

LEXICON N_9KIPÕNʼ
!! kipõnʼ:kipõn
!! * Yaml:__ N-kipwnj9__
   N_9KIPÕNʼ-SG ;
   N_9KIPÕNʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_9KIPÕNʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_9KIPÕNʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_9KIPÕNʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_9KIPÕNʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_9ALLASʼ
!! allasʼ:allas
!! * Yaml:__ N-kipwnj9__
   N_9ALLASʼ-SG ;
   N_9ALLASʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_9ALLASʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_9ALLASʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_9ALLASʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_9ALLASʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_9VETELʼ
!! vetelʼ:vetel
!! * Yaml:__ N-kipwnj9__
   N_9VETELʼ-SG ;
   N_9VETELʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_9VETELʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_9VETELʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_9VETELʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_9VETELʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_9TUKÕV
!! tukõv:tukõv
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
   N_9TUKÕV-SG ;
   N_9TUKÕV-PL ;
LEXICON N_9TUKÕV-SG
+N:     NMN_9TUKÕV-SG ;
LEXICON N_9TUKÕV-PL
+N:     NMN_9TUKÕV-PL ;

LEXICON N_9ELLÄI
!! elläi:elläi
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
   N_9ELLÄI-SG ;
   N_9ELLÄI-PL ;
LEXICON N_9ELLÄI-SG
+N:     NMN_9ELLÄI-SG ;
LEXICON N_9ELLÄI-PL
+N:     NMN_9ELLÄI-PL ;

LEXICON N_9VERREV
!! verrev:verrev
!! * Yaml: __N-ellaei4, N-kipwnj9__
   N_9VERREV-SG ;
   N_9VERREV-PL ;
LEXICON N_9VERREV-SG
+N:	NMN_9VERREV-SG ;
LEXICON N_9VERREV-PL
+N:	NMN_9VERREV-PL ;

LEXICON N_10HÕRAK !!= @CODE@ hõrak:hõrak
        N_10HÕRAK-SG ;
        N_10HÕRAK-PL ;
LEXICON N_10HÕRAK-SG
+N:     NMN_10HÕRAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HÕRAK-PL
+N:     NMN_10HÕRAK-PL ;

LEXICON N_10HAIDAK !!= @CODE@ haidak:haidak
        N_10HAIDAK-SG ;
        N_10HAIDAK-PL ;
LEXICON N_10HAIDAK-SG
+N:     NMN_10HAIDAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HAIDAK-PL
+N:     NMN_10HAIDAK-PL ;

LEXICON N_10ESÄK !!= @CODE@ esäk:esäk
        N_10ESÄK-SG ;
        N_10ESÄK-PL ;
LEXICON N_10ESÄK-SG
+N:     NMN_10ESÄK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10ESÄK-PL
+N:     NMN_10ESÄK-PL ;

LEXICON N_10VIDRIK !!= @CODE@ vidrik:vidrik
!! gradation: no
        N_10VIDRIK-SG ;
        N_10VIDRIK-PL ;
LEXICON N_10VIDRIK-SG
+N:     NMN_10VIDRIK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10VIDRIK-PL
+N:     NMN_10VIDRIK-PL ;

LEXICON N_10AABITS !!= @CODE@ aabits:aabits
        N_10AABITS-SG ;
        N_10AABITS-PL ;
LEXICON N_10AABITS-SG
+N:     NMN_10AABITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AABITS-PL
+N:     NMN_10AABITS-PL ;

LEXICON N_10HEERITS !!= @CODE@ heerits:heerits
        N_10HEERITS-SG ;
        N_10HEERITS-PL ;
LEXICON N_10HEERITS-SG
+N:     NMN_10HEERITS-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HEERITS-PL
+N:     NMN_10HEERITS-PL ;

LEXICON N_10AADRÕSʼ !!= @CODE@ aadrõsʼ:aadrõs
        N_10AADRÕSʼ-SG ;
        N_10AADRÕSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_10AADRÕSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_10AADRÕSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AADRÕSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_10AADRÕSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_10AMMATʼ !!= @CODE@ ammatʼ:ammat
        N_10AMMATʼ-SG ;
        N_10AMMATʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_10AMMATʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_10AMMATʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_10AMMATʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_10AMMATʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_10HÜPÄTSʼ !!= @CODE@ hüpätsʼ:hüpätsʼ
        N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG ;
	N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_10HÜPÄTSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_10HERESKʼ !!= @CODE@ hereskʼ:hereskʼ
        N_10HERESKʼ-SG ;
        N_10HERESKʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_10HERESKʼ-SG
+N:     NMN_10HERESKʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_10HERESKʼ-PL
+N:     NMN_10HERESKʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_10KADSAK !!= @CODE@ kadsak:kadsak
        N_10KADSAK-SG ;
        N_10KADSAK-PL ;
LEXICON N_10KADSAK-SG
+N:     NMN_10KADSAK-SG ;
LEXICON N_10KADSAK-PL
+N:     NMN_10KADSAK-PL ;



LEXICON N_11LÄTEQ !!= @CODE@ läteq:lätte
 N_11LÄTEQ-SG ;
 N_11LÄTEQ-PL ;
LEXICON N_11LÄTEQ-SG
+N: NMN_11LÄTEQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11LÄTEQ-PL
+N: NMN_11LÄTEQ-PL ;

LEXICON N_11AINÕQ !!= @CODE@ ainõq:ainõ
 N_11AINÕQ-SG ;
 N_11AINÕQ-PL ;
LEXICON N_11AINÕQ-SG
+N: NMN_11AINÕQ-SG ;
LEXICON N_11AINÕQ-PL
+N: NMN_11AINÕQ-PL ;

LEXICON N_12REPÄNʼ
 N_12REPÄNʼ-SG ;
 N_12REPÄNʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_12REPÄNʼ-SG
+N: NMN_12REPÄNʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_12REPÄNʼ-PL
+N: NMN_12REPÄNʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_12HOPÕNʼ
 N_12HOPÕNʼ-SG ;
 N_12HOPÕNʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_12HOPÕNʼ-SG
+N: NMN_12HOPÕNʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_12HOPÕNʼ-PL
+N: NMN_12HOPÕNʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_12SÜKÜS
 N_12SÜKÜS-SG ;
 N_12SÜKÜS-PL ;
LEXICON N_12SÜKÜS-SG
+N: NMN_12SÜKÜS-SG ;
LEXICON N_12SÜKÜS-PL
+N: NMN_12SÜKÜS-PL ;

LEXICON N_12NÕKÕSʼ
 N_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG ;
 N_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL ;
LEXICON N_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG
+N: NMN_12NÕKÕSʼ-SG ;
LEXICON N_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL
+N: NMN_12NÕKÕSʼ-PL ;

LEXICON N_13ALONÕ !!= @CODE@ alonõ:alo
! Gradation: No
	N_13ALONÕ-SG ;
	N_13ALONÕ-PL ;
LEXICON N_13ALONÕ-SG
+N:     NMN_13ALONÕ-SG ;
LEXICON N_13ALONÕ-PL
+N:     NMN_13ALONÕ-PL ;

LEXICON N_13TÄHINE !!= @CODE@ tähine:tähi
! Gradation: No
	N_13TÄHINE-SG ;
	N_13TÄHINE-PL ;
LEXICON N_13TÄHINE-SG
+N:     NMN_13TÄHINE-SG ;
LEXICON N_13TÄHINE-PL
+N:     NMN_13TÄHINE-PL ;

LEXICON N_14RITSʼKAS !!= @CODE@ ritsʼkas:ritsʼka
! Gradation: No
        N_14RITSʼKAS-SG ;
        N_14RITSʼKAS-PL ;
LEXICON N_14RITSʼKAS-SG
+N:     NMN_14RITSʼKAS-SG ;
LEXICON N_14RITSʼKAS-PL
+N:     NMN_14RITSʼKAS-PL ;


LEXICON N_14HAMMAS !!= @CODE@ hammas:hamba, saabas:saapa
! gradation: yes
!! distinguished from 14RITSʼKAS due to gradation
        N_14HAMMAS-SG ;
        N_14HAMMAS-PL ;
