src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON nouns
aadrõsʼ:aadrõsʼ N_10AADRÕSʼ  "" ;
asõmõrõivaq:asõmõrõiva N_14RITSʼKAS-PL  "" ;
graafiga:graafiga N_7FÜÜSIGA  "" ;
habõnaq:habõn N_9KIPÕNʼ-PL  "" ;
hereskʼ:heresk N_10HERESKʼ  "" ;
hudilaq:hutil N_9KIPÕNʼ-PL  "" ;
hõrilaq:hõrril N_9KIPÕNʼ-PL  "" ;
jalgratas:jalg#ratta N_14HAMMAS  "" ;
jalodu:jalodu N_3ALADU  "" ;
juppʼ-palit:juppʼ-pali N_10HÕRAK-PL  "" ;
juudahopõnʼ:juuda#hopõ N_12HOPÕNʼ  "" ;
juurʼ:juur N_  "" ;
järvistü:järvistü N_2KERGE  "" ;
kaarakiisla:kaara#kiisla N_2ARTIKLI  "" ;
kahuskʼ:kahuskʼ N_8KASK  "" ;
kammandaja:kammandaja N_5OPPAJA  "" ;
keeledü:keeledü N_3PERÄDÜ  "" ;
kehvä:kehvä N_1HERRÄ  "" ;
kelmüs:kelmüs N_4TERVÜS  "" ;
kidsõlmaq:kidsõlm N_8KASK-PL  "" ;
kidsõrmaq:kidsõrm N_8KASK-PL  "" ;
kihljädsiq:kihljäts N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL  "" ;
kihlädseq:kihläts N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL  "" ;
kirmõq:kirmõ N_11AINÕQ  "" ;
kirvõs:kirvõ N_14RITSʼKAS  "" ;
kivijüräskʼ:kivijüräskʼ N_8HÄIELM  "" ;
klõkin:klõkin N_9KIPÕNʼ  "" ;
kokkolepeq:kokko#leppe N_11LÄTEQ  "" ;
koomits:koomits N_10AABITS  "" ;
koorik:koorik N_10HÕRAK  "" ;
koovitaja:koovitaja N_5OPPAJA  "" ;
korrõ:korrõ N_6MAKÕ  "" ;
kriuhka:kriuhka N_1HANSʼA  "" ;
kryngli:kryngli N_2ARTIKLI  "" ;
kuurõivaq:kuu#rõiva N_14RITSʼKAS-PL  "" ;
kärre:kärre N_9ELLÄI  "" ;
kõlvadu:kõlvadu N_3ALADU  "" ;
kõvaskʼ:kõvaskʼ N_8KASK  "" ;
kügrätsʼ:kügräts N_10HÜPÄTSʼ  "" ;
laius:laius N_4AINUS  "" ;
langaratas:langa#ratta N_14HAMMAS  "" ;
lapits:lapits N_10AABITS  "" ;
latsõnõ:latsõ N_13ALONÕ  "" ;
lemmigeq:lemmik N_10ESÄK-PL  "" ;
lihtsä:lihtsä N_2KERGE  "" ;
liimik:liimik N_10ESÄK  "" ;
lipits:lipits N_10HEERITS  "" ;
lopõ:lopõ N_6MAKÕ  "" ;
läügeq:läüke N_11LÄTEQ  "" ;
läülä:läülä N_1HERRÄ  "" ;
läütüs:läütüs N_4TERVÜS  "" ;
lõõnõq:lõõnõ N_11AINÕQ  "" ;
maahopõnʼ:maa#hopõ N_12HOPÕNʼ  "" ;
matsin:matsin N_9KIPÕNʼ  "" ;
matõmaatiga:matõmaatiga N_7FÜÜSIGA  "" ;
meeledü:meeledü N_3PERÄDÜ  "" ;
mehene:mehe N_13TÄHINE  "" ;
määne:määne N_14RITSʼKAS  "" ;
nibrits:nibrits N_10HEERITS  "" ;
nudrõtsʼ:nudrõtsʼ N_10HÕRAK  "" ;
nukisʼ:nukisʼ N_12NÕKÕSʼ  "" ;
nukusʼ:nukusʼ N_12NÕKÕSʼ  "" ;
nähkärʼ:nähkärʼ N_8HÄIELM  "" ;
närvädü:närvädü N_3PERÄDÜ  "" ;
nõsaraq:nõsaraq N_12REPÄNʼ  "" ;
nõstvaq:nõstvaq N_2ARTIKLI-PL  "" ;
nʼuhva:nʼuhva N_1HANSʼA  "" ;
oppaja:oppaja N_5OPPAJA  "" ;
palgus:palgus N_4AINUS  "" ;
papinõ:papi N_13ALONÕ  "" ;
pekli:pekli N_2KERGE  "" ;
perrätulija:perrätulija N_2ARTIKLI  "" ;
pihidsäq:pihits N_10HÜPÄTSʼ-PL  "" ;
pikne:pikne N_8KASK  "" ;
pleiätsʼ:pleiäts N_10HÜPÄTSʼ  "" ;
poliitiga:poliitiga N_7FÜÜSIGA  "" ;
prässäk:prässäk N_10ESÄK  "" ;
puulʼpühäne:puulʼpühä N_13TÄHINE  "" ;
pällün:pällün N_9ELLÄI  "" ;
päädigeq:päädik N_10ESÄK-PL  "" ;
põhʼadu:põhʼadu N_3ALADU  "" ;
püürtüq:püürtü N_2KERGE-PL  "" ;
rabakpaklaq:rabak#pakla N_14RITSʼKAS-PL  "" ;
raudnõkõsʼ:raud#nõkõsʼ N_12NÕKÕSʼ  "" ;
repänʼ:repä N_12REPÄNʼ  "" ;
rõõgõq:rõõkõ N_11AINÕQ  "" ;
ründeq:ründe N_11LÄTEQ  "" ;
saarʼ:saar N_  "" ;
saivas:saiva N_14RITSʼKAS  "" ;
sidimeq:sidim N_9ELLÄI-PL  "" ;
sille:sille N_6MAKÕ  "" ;
silmävalgus:silmä#valgus N_4AINUS  "" ;
sine:sine N_1HERRÄ  "" ;
sorsʼo:sorsʼo N_1HANSʼA  "" ;
süküs:süküs N_12SÜKÜS  "" ;
süvvüs:süvvüs N_4TERVÜS  "" ;
tahvõtʼ:tahvõtʼ N_10HÕRAK  "" ;
tampka:tampka N_2ARTIKLI  "" ;
tehniga:tehniga N_7FÜÜSIGA  "" ;
templi:templi N_2KERGE  "" ;
tikõveletsʼ:tikõvelets N_10HÜPÄTSʼ  "" ;
toonanõ:toona N_13ALONÕ  "" ;
toroskʼ:toroskʼ N_8KASK  "" ;
torpʼhuulʼ:torpʼ#huul N_  "" ;
tsitronʼhapas:tsitronʼhappa N_14HAMMAS  "" ;
tsäbräk:tsäbräk N_10ESÄK  "" ;
tundihopõnʼ:tundi#hopõ N_12HOPÕNʼ  "" ;
tunnistaja:tunnistaja N_5OPPAJA  "" ;
tupits:tupits N_10AABITS  "" ;
tuulõvurril:tuulõvurril N_9KIPÕNʼ  "" ;
tuulʼalodsõq:tuulʼ#alo N_13ALONÕ-PL  "" ;
täpnine:täpni N_13TÄHINE  "" ;
tümme:tümme N_6MAKÕ  "" ;
valladu:valladu N_3ALADU  "" ;
vereväq:verrev N_9ELLÄI-PL  "" ;
vilets:vilets N_10HEERITS  "" ;
vintüs:vintüs N_8HÄIELM  "" ;
vytsi:vytsi N_1HANSʼA  "" ;
ärädü:ärädü N_3PERÄDÜ  "" ;
ääde:ääde N_1HERRÄ  "" ;
õigus:õigus N_4AINUS  "" ;
ütsüs:ütsüs N_4TERVÜS  "" ;
üüelläi:üü#elläi N_9ELLÄI  "" ;
